Florida, session 2026, HB961.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of section
319.30, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
319.30 Definitions; dismantling, destruction, change of
identity of motor vehicle, vessel, or mobile home; salvage.—
(3)
(d) An electronic signature that is consistent with
chapter 668 satisfies any signature required under this
subsection, except that an electronic signature on an odometer
disclosure submitted through an insurance company must be
executed using an electronic signature, as defined in s.
668.003(4). The insurance company or its authorized agent shall
implement control processes and procedures acceptable to the
department to ensure adequate identity verification,
preservation, disposition, integrity, security, confidentiality,
and auditability of the electronic signature, which uses a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb961 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 961 2026 Legislature
system providing an Identity Assurance Level, Authenticator
Assurance Level, and Federation Assurance Level, as described in
the National Institute of Standards and Technology Special
Publication 800-63-3, as of December 1, 2017, which are
equivalent to or greater than Level 2, for each level, for a
certificate of destruction or for a salvage certificate of
title.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb961 -01-er